Hawaii statutes.
§448-12 Temporary license. [(a)] The
board of dental examiners may issue without examination to any resident or
nonresident otherwise qualified to be examined a temporary license to practice
dentistry in the employment of or while under contract with the State or any
county, or any legally incorporated eleemosynary dispensary or infirmary,
private school, or welfare center. The temporary license shall authorize the
person to whom the license is issued to practice dentistry exclusively while
engaged in that employment or contracted by the department of health to conduct
dental education and training, and shall be in force until the earliest of the
following occurs:

(1) The date the person leaves the employment
authorized under the temporary license;

(2) The three hundred ninety-sixth calendar day
following the date of issuance of the temporary license;

(3) The date on which the results of the licensure
examination taken by the person under this chapter are posted by the board; or

(4) The date on which the board revokes the temporary
license;

provided that the board may revoke the temporary
license at any time for cause.

No person who has failed an examination shall
have the benefit of any temporary license.

[(b)] The board of dental examiners may issue
a temporary license without examination to any person otherwise qualified to be
examined, who is enrolled in a post-doctoral residency program that is
accredited and recognized by the American Dental Association Commission on
Dental Accreditation. The temporary license shall authorize the person to whom
the license is issued to practice dentistry exclusively under the auspices of
the dental residency program and shall be in force until the earliest of the
following occurs:

(1) The date the person completes or leaves the
residency program; or

(2) The date on which the board revokes the temporary
license;

provided that the
board may revoke the temporary license at any time for cause.

[(c)] Post-doctoral dental residents who are
granted temporary licenses under this section shall:

(1) Be assigned to affiliated training sites that are
restricted to eleemosynary health care organizations, training site hospitals,
or university-affiliated training programs, and that shall be visited and
accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental
Association, consistent with the policies of the Commission on Dental
Accreditation of the American Dental Association; and

(2) Act under the direct supervision of the dental
residency faculty licensed in Hawaii. [L 1949, c 177, pt of §3; RL 1955,
§61-12; HRS §448-12; am L 1969, c 245, §1; am L 1981, c 185, §1; am L 1983, c
124, §16; am L 1985, c 13, §1; am L 1986, c 339, §75; am L 1989, c 231, §1; am
L 2009, c 36, §2 and c 37, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next